California statutes. Revenue and Taxation Code
An organization described in Section 23701d which is subject to the provisions of this article, except those specified in Sections 23736, shall not be exempt from taxation under Article 1 of this chapter if it has engaged in a prohibited transaction after January 1, 1951; and an organization described in Section 23701n which is subject to the provisions of this article shall not be exempt from taxation under Article 1 of this chapter if it has engaged in a prohibited transaction after December 31, 1960.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1961, Ch. 857.)
-------------------------------------------

23736.3.

An organization described in Section 23701n or Section 23701d, except as specified in Section 23736, shall be denied exemption under Section 23736.2 only for taxable years subsequent to the taxable years during which it is notified by the Franchise Tax Board that it has engaged in a prohibited transaction, unless such organization entered into such prohibited transaction with the purpose of diverting corpus or income of the organization from its exempt purposes, and such transaction involved a substantial part of the corpus or income of such
 organization.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 862, Sec. 98.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

23736.4.

Any organization denied exemption under Section 23701d or Section 23701n by reason of the provisions of Section 23736.2 with respect to any taxable year following the taxable year in which notice of denial of exemption was received, may, under regulations prescribed by the Franchise Tax Board, file claim for exemption, and if the Franchise Tax Board pursuant to such regulations, is satisfied that such organizations will not knowingly again engage in a prohibited transaction, such organization shall be exempt with respect to taxable years subsequent to the
 year in which such claim is filed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 862, Sec. 99.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

23737.

In the case of any organization described in Section 23701d to which this article is applicable, exemption under Article 1 (commencing with Section 23701) shall be denied for the taxable year if the amounts accumulated out of income during the taxable year or any prior taxable year and not actually paid out by the end of the taxable year—

(a) Are unreasonable in amount or duration in order to carry out the charitable, educational, or other purpose or function constituting the basis for such
 organization’s exemption under Section 23701d; or

(b) Are used to a substantial degree for purposes or functions other than those constituting the basis for such organization’s exemption under Section 23701d, or

(c) Are invested in such a manner as to jeopardize the carrying out of the charitable, educational, or other purpose or function constituting the basis for such organization’s exemption under Section 23701d.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 862, Sec. 100.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

23740.

Section 4911 of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to tax on excess expenditures to influence legislation, shall apply, except as otherwise provided.

(a) Section 4911(a)(1) of the Internal Revenue Code shall not apply.

(b) Section 4911(f)(4)(A) of the Internal Revenue Code shall include efforts to influence legislation with respect to acts, bills, resolutions, or similar items by the State Legislature.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 252, Sec. 34.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

23741.

Notwithstanding any other provision in this part, in the case of a church exempt from taxes imposed under this part pursuant to Article 1 (commencing with Section 23701) of Chapter 4, any rental income received, directly or indirectly, from another church exempt from taxes imposed under this part pursuant to Article 1 (commencing with Section 23701) of Chapter 4 for rental of exempt function church property is exempt from any tax imposed by this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1981, Ch. 341, Sec. 1.   Effective September 9, 1981.   Applicable to income years beginning on or after January 1, 1981, by Sec. 2 of Ch. 341.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Returns of Exempt Organizations [23771. - 23778.]

23771.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), every organization, otherwise exempt under Article 1 (commencing with Section 23701), but having income of the character described in Article 2 (commencing with Section 23731), shall file a return, verified by an executive officer under penalty of perjury in the form prescribed by the Franchise Tax Board, on or before the 15th day of the fifth month following the close of the taxable year, reporting its income from those activities and shall pay a tax as required by Section 23731 on its
 unrelated business taxable income as defined in Section 23732.

(b) An education IRA described in Section 23712 shall file a return described in subdivision (a) on or before the 15th day of the fourth month following the close of the taxable year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 862, Sec. 101.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

23772.

(a) For the purposes of this part—

(1) Except as provided in paragraph (2), every organization exempt from taxation under Section 23701 and every trust treated as a private foundation because of Section 4947(a)(1) of the Internal Revenue Code shall file an annual return, stating specifically the items of gross income, receipts, and disbursements, and any other information for the purpose of carrying out the laws under this part as the Franchise Tax Board may by rules or regulations prescribe, and shall keep any records, render under oath any statements, make any other returns, and comply with any rules and regulations as the Franchise Tax Board may from time to time prescribe. The
 return shall be filed on or before the 15th day of the fifth full calendar month following the close of the taxable year.

(2) Exceptions from filing—

(A) Mandatory exceptions—Paragraph (1) shall not apply to—

(i) Churches, their integrated auxiliaries, and conventions or association of churches,

(ii) An organization (other than a private foundation as defined in Section 23709), the gross receipts of which in each taxable year are normally not more than fifty thousand dollars ($50,000), or

(iii) The exclusively religious activities of any religious order.

(B) Discretionary exceptions—The Franchise Tax Board may permit the filing of a simplified return for organizations based on either gross receipts or total assets or both gross receipts and total assets, or may permit the filing of an information statement (without fee), or may permit the filing of a group return for incorporated or unincorporated branches of a state or national organization where it determines that an information return is not necessary to the efficient administration of this part.

(b) Every organization described in Section 23701d that is subject to the requirements of subdivision (a) is required to furnish annually information, at the time and in the manner as the Franchise Tax Board may by rules or regulations prescribe, setting forth all of the following:

(1) Its gross income for the year.

(2) Its expenses attributable to gross income and incurred within the year.

(3) Its disbursements within the year for the purposes for which it is exempt.

(4) A balance sheet showing its assets, liabilities, and net worth as of the beginning of that year.

(5) The total of the contributions and gifts received by it during the year, and the names and addresses of all substantial contributors.

(6) The names and addresses of its foundation manager (within the meaning of Section 4946 of the Internal Revenue Code) and highly compensated employees.

(7) The compensation and other payments made during the year to each individual described in paragraph (6).

(8) In the case of an organization with respect to which an election under Section 23704.5 is effective for the taxable year, the following amounts for that organization for that taxable year:

(A) The lobbying expenditures (as defined in Section 4911(c)(1) of the Internal Revenue Code).

(B) The lobbying nontaxable amount (as defined in Section 4911(c)(2) of the Internal Revenue Code).

(C) The grassroots expenditures (as defined in Section 4911(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code).

(D) The grassroots nontaxable amount (as defined in Section 4911(c)(4) of the Internal Revenue Code). For purposes of this paragraph, if Section 23740 applies to the organization for the taxable year, the organization shall furnish the amounts with respect to the affiliated group as well as with respect to the organization.

(9) Other information with respect to direct or indirect transfers to, and other direct or indirect transactions and relationships with, other organizations described in Sections 23701a to 23701w, inclusive (other than Sections 23701d, 23701k, and 23701t), as the Franchise Tax Board may require to prevent either of the following:

(A) Diversion of funds from the organization’s exempt purpose.

(B) Misallocation of revenue or expense.

(10) Information with respect to qualified disaster relief activities.

(11) Any other relevant information as the Franchise Tax Board may prescribe.

(12) Each controlling organization, within the meaning of Section 512(b)(13) of the Internal Revenue Code, which is subject to the requirements of subdivision (a), shall include on the return required under subdivision (a) all of the following information:

(A) Any interest,
 royalties, annuities, or rents received from each controlled entity, within the meaning of Section 512(b)(13) of the Internal Revenue Code.

(B) Any loans made to each controlled entity.

(C) Any transfers of funds between such controlling organization and each such controlled entity.

(13) (A) Any organization, the gross receipts of which in any taxable year result in the organization being referred to in clause (ii) of subparagraph (A) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (a), or subparagraph (B) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (a), shall do both of the following:

(i) Furnish annually, in electronic form, and
 at the time and in the manner as may be prescribed by the Franchise Tax Board, the legal name of the organization, any name under which the organization operates or does business, the organization’s mailing address and the internet website address, if any, the organization’s taxpayer identification number, the name and address of a principal officer, and evidence of the continuing basis for the organization’s exemption from the filing requirements under paragraph (1) of subdivision (a).

(ii) Upon termination of the existence of the organization, shall furnish notice of the termination.

(B) This paragraph shall apply to notices and returns with respect to annual periods beginning on or after January 1, 2010.

(14) (A) If an organization described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) or paragraph (13) of this subdivision fails to file an annual return or notice required under either paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) or paragraph (13) of this subdivision for three consecutive years, that organization’s status as an organization exempt from tax under Section 23701 shall be considered revoked on and after the date set by the Franchise Tax Board for the filing of the third annual return or notice. The Franchise Tax Board shall publish and maintain a list of any organization for which the tax-exempt status is revoked.

(B) Any organization for which the tax-exempt status is revoked under subparagraph (A) must apply for reinstatement of that status regardless of whether that organization was originally required to make an
 application for tax-exempt status.

(C) If, upon application for reinstatement of status as an organization exempt from tax under Section 23701, an organization described in subparagraph (A) can show to the satisfaction of the Franchise Tax Board evidence of reasonable cause for the failure described in that subparagraph, the organization’s exempt status may, in the discretion of the Franchise Tax Board, be reinstated effective from the date of the revocation under that subparagraph.

(D) This paragraph shall apply to notices and returns with respect to annual periods beginning on or after January 1, 2010.

(c) For the purposes of this part—

(1) In the case of a failure to
 file a return required under this section on the date and in the manner prescribed therefor (determined with regard to any extension of time for filing), unless it is shown that the failure is due to reasonable cause, there shall be paid (on notice and demand by the Franchise Tax Board and in the same manner as tax) by the exempt organization or trust failing so to file, five dollars ($5) for each month or part thereof during which the failure continues, but the total amount imposed hereunder on any organization for failure to file any return may not exceed forty dollars ($40).

(2) The Franchise Tax Board may make written demand upon a private foundation failing to file under paragraph (1) of this subdivision specifying therein a reasonable future date by which the filing shall be made, and if the filing is not made on or before that
 date, and unless it is shown that failure so to file is due to reasonable cause, there shall be paid (on notice and demand by the Franchise Tax Board and in the same manner as tax) by the person failing so to file, in addition to the penalty prescribed in paragraph (1), a penalty of five dollars ($5) each month or part thereof after the expiration of the time specified in the written demand during which the failure continues, but the total amount imposed hereunder on all persons for the failure to file shall not exceed twenty-five dollars ($25). If more than one person is liable under this paragraph for a failure to file, all of those persons shall be jointly and severally liable with respect to the failure. The term “person” as used herein means any officer, director, trustee, employee, member, or other individual who is under a duty to perform the act in respect of which the violation occurs.

(3) This subdivision shall not apply with respect to any notice required under paragraph (13) of subdivision (b).

(d) The amendments made to this section by Chapter 858 of the Statutes of 2012 shall apply to taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2012.

(e) The amendments made to this section by the act adding this subdivision shall become operative on January 1, 2021.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 59, Sec. 4.   (SB 934)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

23774.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), every organization exempt from filing an annual information return by reason of subdivision (a) of Section 23772, may be required to file an annual statement on or before the 15th day of the fifth calendar month following the close of the taxable year setting forth in the manner as may be required by the Franchise Tax Board the following information: the name and address of the organization, its major activities, its sources of income, and the section of the Internal Revenue Code under which
 it is exempt. Organizations other than those described in clause (i) and (iii) of subparagraph (A) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 23772 may also be required by the Franchise Tax Board to furnish information with respect to their gross receipts and their assets.

(b) Every religious organization exempt from filing an annual information return by reason of subdivision (a) of Section 23772, which because of sincerely held religious convictions refuses to file an annual statement as prescribed in subdivision (a), may submit in lieu thereof a notarized statement on its organizational letterhead containing the following information: the name and address of the organization, its major activities, its sources of income, and the section of the Internal Revenue Code under which it is exempt. That information shall be for the sole purpose of verifying the absence of unrelated business income of the organization. The statement shall be
 submitted on or before the 15th day of the fifth calendar month following the close of the taxable year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 862, Sec. 103.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

23775.

Except for purposes of amending the articles of incorporation to set forth a new name, under regulations prescribed by the Franchise Tax Board, the corporate powers, rights and privileges of an exempt domestic corporation may be suspended and the exercise of the corporate powers, rights and privileges of a foreign exempt corporation in this state may be forfeited if the organization fails to file the annual return or statement required under Section 23772 or 23774, or pay any amount due under Section 23703 or 23772 on or before the last day of the 12th
 month following the close of the taxable year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 862, Sec. 104.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

23776.

(a) Any organization which has suffered the suspension or forfeiture provided for in Section 23775 may, in accordance with Section 23305a, be relieved therefrom upon the filing of all of the following:

(1) An application for revivor.

(2) When required by the Franchise Tax Board, a new application for exemption under Section 23701.

(3) Any
 returns, statements, notifications, or amounts due under Sections 23772, 23774, or 23775 which were not previously submitted or paid and which resulted in the suspension or forfeiture.

(4) An information return or statement and the amounts specified under Section 23772 for each year, or part thereof, during the period of suspension or forfeiture in which the organization conducted any activities or received income, grants, gifts or any other asset.

(b) Any organization exempt from tax under Section 23701 which has suffered the suspension or forfeiture provided for in Section 23301 or 23301.5 may be required by the Franchise Tax Board to file a new application for exemption in connection with an application for revivor under Section 23305.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 987, Sec. 92.   Effective October 10, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

23777.

The exemption granted to any organization under the provisions of Article 1 (commencing with Section 23701) of this chapter may be revoked by the Franchise Tax Board if the organization fails to—

(a) File any return required under this chapter or pay any amount due under this part or Part 10.2 (commencing with Section 18401) on or before the last day of the 12th month following the close of the taxable year;

(b) Comply with
 Section 19504 (relating to powers of the Franchise Tax Board to examine records and subpoena witnesses); or

(c) Confine its activities to those permitted by the section under which the exemption was granted.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 862, Sec. 105.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

23778.

An organization whose exemption was revoked under Section 23703 or 23777 may be reestablished as an exempt organization upon:

(a) The filing or payment of both of the following:

(1) A new application for exemption.

(2) Any returns, statements, or payment of any amounts due under this part or Part 10.2 (commencing with Section 18401) that were not previously submitted or paid and that resulted in the revocation.

(b) When revocation occurred under subdivision (c) of Section 23777, satisfactory proof
 that all of the following have occurred:

(1) The organization has corrected its nonexempt activities.

(2) That it will operate in an exempt manner in the future.

(3) The payment of any tax for periods the organization was not qualified for exemption.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 59, Sec. 6.   (SB 934)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4.5. Tax Treatment of S Corporations and Their Shareholders [23800. - 23813.]

23800.

Subchapter S of Chapter 1 of Subtitle A of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to the tax treatment of “S corporations” and their shareholders, shall apply, except as otherwise provided.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 268, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

23800.5.

(a) Section 1361(b)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to treatment of certain wholly owned subsidiaries, is modified as follows:

(1) For purposes of Part 10 (commencing with Section 17001), Part 10.2 (commencing with Section 18401), and this part:

(A) Section 1361(b)(3)(A)(i) of the Internal Revenue Code shall apply, except as provided in subparagraph (B).

(B) There is hereby imposed a tax annually in an amount equal to the applicable amount specified in paragraph (1) of subdivision (d) of Section 23153 on a qualified Subchapter S subsidiary that is incorporated under the laws of this state, qualified to transact intrastate business in this state pursuant to Chapter 21 (commencing with Section 2100) of Division 1 of Title 1 of the Corporations Code, or doing business in this state.

(C) Every qualified Subchapter S subsidiary described in subparagraph (B) shall be subject to the tax imposed under subparagraph (B) from the earlier of the date of incorporation, qualification, or commencement of business in this state, until the effective date of dissolution or withdrawal as provided in Section 23331, or, if later, the date the corporation ceases to do business in this state.

(2) For purposes of Part 10 (commencing with Section 17001), Part 10.2 (commencing with Section 18401), and this part:

(A) Section 1361(b)(3)(A)(ii) of the Internal Revenue Code does not apply and, in lieu thereof, subparagraph (B) shall apply and all references to Section 1361(b)(3)(A)(ii) of the Internal Revenue Code shall be treated as a reference to subparagraph (B).

(B) All activities, assets, liabilities, including liability for the tax imposed under this subdivision, and items of income, deduction, and credit of a qualified Subchapter S subsidiary shall be treated as activities (including activities for purposes of Section 23101), assets, liabilities, and those items, as the case may be, of the “S corporation.”

(3) Section 1361(b)(3)(B) of the Internal Revenue Code is modified to include the
 following requirements in addition to the requirements contained therein:

(A) The “S corporation” has in effect a valid election to treat the corporation as a qualified Subchapter S subsidiary for federal income tax purposes.

(B) An election made by the “S corporation” under Section 1361(b)(3)(B)(ii) of the Internal Revenue Code to treat the corporation as a qualified Subchapter S subsidiary for federal income tax purposes shall be treated for purposes of this part as an election made by the “S corporation” under this subdivision and a separate election under paragraph (3) of subdivision (e) of Section 23051.5 may not be allowed.

(C) No election under this subdivision shall be allowed unless the “S corporation” has made the election under Section 1361(b)(3)(B)(ii) of the Internal Revenue Code to treat the corporation
 as a qualified Subchapter S subsidiary for federal income tax purposes.

(b) Section 1361(c)(6) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to certain exempt organizations permitted as shareholders, is modified by substituting a reference to Section 17631 or Section 23701d in lieu of the reference to Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code and by substituting a reference to Section 17631 or Section 23701 in lieu of the reference to Section 501(a) of the Internal Revenue Code.

(c) Section 1361(e)(1)(B)(ii) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to certain trusts not eligible, is modified by substituting “under Part 10 (commencing with Section 17001) or this part” in lieu of “under this subtitle.”

(d) Section 1361(e)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to election, is modified to include the following
 provisions:

(1) An election made by the trustee under Section 1361(e) of the Internal Revenue Code to be an electing small business trust for federal income tax purposes shall be treated for purposes of this part as an election made by the trustee under this subdivision and a separate election under paragraph (3) of subdivision (e) of Section 23051.5 may not be allowed. Any election made shall apply to the taxable year of the trust for which that election is made and to all subsequent taxable years of that trust, unless revoked with the consent of the Franchise Tax Board.

(2) No election under this subdivision shall be allowed unless the trustee has made the election under Section 1361(e) of the Internal Revenue Code to be an electing small business trust for federal income tax purposes.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 268, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

23801.

(a) A corporation that has in effect for federal income tax purposes a valid election under Section 1362(a) of the Internal Revenue Code shall be an “S” corporation for purposes of Part 10 (commencing with Section 17001), Part 10.2 (commencing with Section 18401), and this part.

(b) A corporation that is an “S corporation” for federal income tax purposes, shall be an “S corporation” for purposes of Part 10 (commencing with Section 17001), Part 10.2 (commencing with Section
 18401), and this part, and its shareholders shall be shareholders of an “S corporation” without regard to whether the corporation is qualified to do business or is incorporated in this state.

(c) Except as provided in subdivision (d), a corporation that is an “S corporation” for purposes of this part may not be included in a combined report pursuant to Chapter 17 (commencing with Section 25101).

(d) (1) In cases where the Franchise Tax Board determines that the reported income or loss of a group of commonly owned or controlled corporations (within the meaning of Section 25105), that includes one or more corporations treated as an “S corporation” under Chapter 4.5 (commencing with Section 23800), does not clearly reflect income (or loss) of a member of that group or represents an evasion of tax by one or more members of that group, and the Franchise Tax Board
 determines that the comparable uncontrolled price method prescribed by regulations pursuant to Section 482 of the Internal Revenue Code cannot practically be applied, the Franchise Tax Board may, in lieu of other methods prescribed by regulations pursuant to Section 482 of the Internal Revenue Code, apply methods of unitary combination, pursuant to Article 1 (commencing with Section 25101) of Chapter 17, to properly reflect the income or loss of the members of the group.

(2) The application of the provisions of this subdivision shall not affect the treatment of any corporation as an “S corporation.”

(e) (1) A termination of a federal election pursuant to Section 1362(d) of the Internal Revenue Code, that is not an inadvertent termination pursuant to Section 1362(f) of the Internal Revenue Code, shall simultaneously terminate the “S corporation” election for
 purposes of Part 10 (commencing with Section 17001), Part 10.2 (commencing with Section 18401), and this part.

(2) A federal termination by revocation shall be effective for purposes of this part and shall be reported to the Franchise Tax Board in the form and manner prescribed by the Franchise Tax Board no later than the last date allowed for filing federal termination for that year under Section 1362(d) of the Internal Revenue Code.

(f) The tax for a “C corporation” for a short year shall be determined in accordance with Chapter 13 (commencing with Section 24631), in lieu of Section 1362(e)(5) of the Internal Revenue Code.

(g) Section 1362(d)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to circumstances where passive investment income exceeds 25 percent of gross receipts for three consecutive taxable years and the
 corporation has accumulated earnings and profits, does not apply unless the “S” election is terminated for federal income tax purposes.

(h) (1) The provisions of Section 1362(b)(5) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to authority to treat late elections, etc., as timely, shall apply only for taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 1997, with respect to elections under Section 1362(a) of the Internal Revenue Code for taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 1997.

(2) Notwithstanding the provisions of paragraph (1), if for any taxable year beginning on or after January 1, 2003, a corporation fails to qualify as an “S corporation” for federal income tax purposes solely because the federal Form 2553 (Election by a Small Business Corporation) was not filed timely, the corporation shall be treated for purposes of this part as an “S corporation” for
 the taxable year the “S corporation” election should have been made, and for each subsequent year until terminated, if the corporation and its shareholders have filed with the Internal Revenue Service a federal Form 2553 requesting automatic relief with respect to the late “S corporation” election, in full compliance with the federal Revenue Procedure 1997-48, I.R.B. 1997-43, and have received notification of the acceptance of the untimely filed “S corporation” election from the Internal Revenue Service. A copy of the notification shall be provided to the Franchise Tax Board upon request.

(i) The provisions of Section 1362(f) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to inadvertent invalid elections or terminations, shall apply only for taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 1997, with respect to elections under Section 1362(a) of the Internal Revenue Code for taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 1997.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 268, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

23802.

(a) Section 1363(a) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to the taxability of an “S” corporation does not apply.

(b) Corporations that are “S” corporations under this chapter shall continue to be subject to the taxes imposed under Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 23101) and Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 23501), except as follows:

(1) The tax imposed under Section 23151 or 23501 shall be imposed at a rate of 112 percent rather than the rate specified in those sections.

(2) In the case of an “S” corporation that is also a financial corporation, the rate of tax specified in paragraph (1) shall be increased by the excess of the rate imposed under Section 23183 over the rate imposed under Section 23151.

(c) An “S” corporation is subject to the minimum franchise tax imposed under Section 23153.

(d) (1) For purposes of subdivision (b), an “S” corporation shall be allowed a deduction under Section 24416 or 24416.1 (relating to net operating loss deductions), but only
 with respect to losses incurred during periods in which the corporation is an “S” corporation for purposes of this part.

(2) Section 1371(b) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to denial of carryovers between “C” years and “S” years, applies for purposes of the tax imposed under subdivision (b), except as provided in paragraph (1).

(3) The provisions of this subdivision do not affect the amount of any item of income or loss computed in accordance with the provisions of Section 1366 of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to pass-thru of items to shareholders.

(4) For purposes of subdivision (b) of Section 17276, relating to limitations on loss carryovers, losses passed through to shareholders of an “S” corporation, to the extent otherwise allowable without application of that subdivision, shall be fully included in
 the net operating loss of that shareholder and then that subdivision shall be applied to the entire net operating loss.

(e) For purposes of computing the taxes specified in subdivision (b), an “S” corporation shall be allowed a deduction from income for built-in gains and passive investment income for which a tax has been imposed under this part in accordance with the provisions of Section 1374 of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to tax imposed on certain built-in gains, or Section 1375 of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to tax imposed on passive investment income.

(f) For purposes of computing taxes imposed under this part, as provided in subdivision (b):

(1) An “S” corporation shall compute its deductions for amortization and depreciation in accordance with the provisions of Part 10 (commencing with Section
 17001) of Division 2.

(2) Section 465 of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to limitation of deductions to the amount at risk, shall be applied in the same manner as in the case of an individual.

(3) (A) Section 469 of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to limitations on passive activity losses and credits, shall be applied in the same manner as in the case of an individual. For purposes of the tax imposed under Section 23151 or 23501, as modified by this section, material participation shall be determined in accordance with Section 469(h) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to certain closely held “C” corporations and personal service corporations.

(B) For purposes of this paragraph, the “adjusted gross income” of the “S” corporation shall be equal to its “net income,” as determined under
 Section 24341 with the modifications required by this subdivision, except that a deduction shall not be allowed for contributions allowed by Section 24357.

(4) The deduction for bad debts under paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 24348 shall not be allowed to an “S” corporation.

(g) (1) The provisions of Section 1363(d) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to recapture of LIFO benefits, shall be modified for purposes of this part to refer to Section 19101 in lieu of Section 6601 of the Internal Revenue Code.

(2) For purposes of Section 19023, relating to the definition of “estimated tax,” and Section 19142, relating to an addition to tax for underpayment of estimated tax, the tax imposed pursuant to this subdivision is not a tax imposed by this part.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 92, Sec. 199.   (SB 1289)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

23802.5.

(a) Section 1366(a)(1) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to determination of shareholder’s tax liability, is modified to apply to the final taxable year of a trust or estate that terminates before the end of the corporation’s taxable year.

(b) Section 1366(d)(1)(A) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to losses and deductions that cannot exceed shareholder’s basis in stock and debt, is modified to additionally provide that the adjusted basis of a shareholder’s stock
 in the “S corporation” is to be decreased by distributions by the corporation that were not includable in the income of the shareholder by reason of Section 1368 of the Internal Revenue Code.

(c) Section 1366(d)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to carryover of disallowed losses and deductions to post-termination transition period, is modified to provide that to the extent that any increase in adjusted basis described in Section 1366(d)(3)(B) of the Internal Revenue Code would have increased the shareholder’s amount at risk under Section 465 if the increase had occurred on the day preceding the commencement of the post-termination transition period, rules similar to the rules described in Section 1366(d)(3)(A) to (C), inclusive, of the Internal Revenue Code shall apply to any losses disallowed by reason of Section 465(a) of the Internal Revenue Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 268, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

23803.

(a) With respect to credits that are otherwise allowed to reduce the taxes imposed under this part:

(1) The amount of any credit to be claimed shall be limited to one-third of the amount otherwise allowable.

(2) (A) Any unused portion of the credit allowable under paragraph (1) (one-third of the total credit) shall be allowed to be carried forward and may not be subject to additional
 reductions under paragraph (1) in later years.

(B) No carryforward shall be allowed for the portion of the credit denied under paragraph (1) (two-thirds of the total credit).

(C) Credits carried forward from taxable years beginning prior to the first taxable year in which the corporation is treated as an “S corporation” under this part, shall be reduced in accordance with paragraph (1) for that first taxable year and may not be subject to additional reductions under paragraph (1) in later years.

(D) The provisions of paragraphs (2) and (3) of subdivision (f) of Section 23802 shall be applied prior to the reduction required by paragraph (1).

(E) No portion of any credit to which this subdivision applies shall be passed through to the shareholders of the
 “S corporation.”

(F) The provisions of this subdivision do not affect the amount of any credit computed under Part 10 (commencing with Section 17001) for pass through to shareholders in accordance with the provisions of Section 1366 of the Internal Revenue Code.

(b) Section 1366(f) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to special rules, shall be modified as follows:

(1) The amount of tax used to compute the loss allowed by Section 1366(f)(2) shall be the amount of tax imposed on built-in gains under this part.

(2) The amount of tax used to compute the reduction allowed by Section 1366(f)(3) shall be the amount of tax imposed on excess net passive income under this part.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 268, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

23804.

Section 1367(b)(4) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to adjustments in case of inherited stock, shall apply for decedents dying after December 31, 1996.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 268, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

23806.

(a) Section 1371(a) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to application of Subchapter C rules, is modified to provide that, notwithstanding subdivisions (a) and (e) of Sections 17024.5 and 23051.5, any election by an “S corporation” or its shareholders under Section 338 of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to certain stock purchases treated as asset acquisitions, for federal purposes shall be treated as an election for purposes of this part and a separate election under paragraph (3) of subdivision (e) of Section 17024.5 or 23051.5 shall not be allowed.

(b) No election under Section 338 of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to certain stock
 purchases treated as asset acquisitions, shall be allowed for state purposes unless the “S corporation” or its shareholders made a valid election for federal purposes under Section 338 of the Internal Revenue Code.

(c) Section 1371(d) of the Internal Revenue Code shall not apply.

(d) (1) Subdivisions (a) and (b) shall apply to any transaction occurring on or after January 1, 1998, in a taxable year beginning on or after January 1, 1997.

(2) Subdivision (c) shall apply to taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 1997.

(e) Section 1371(f) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to cash distributions following post-termination
 transition period, shall not apply.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 231, Sec. 86.   (SB 711)   Effective October 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

23807.
